Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB172.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 154.50-323 is amended to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision or section of KRS 154.50-301 to 154.50-346, no
governmental unit shall have the power to condemn property under KRS 154.50-301 to
154.50-346 unless the governmental unit has first given proper public notice as required
by law stating the specific purpose for which the property to be condemned shall be used
and said purposes shall be pleaded and proved in such condemnation action. The property
shall be developed within a period of five (5) years pursuant to the purpose stated, and
the failure of the authority to so develop shall entitle the person or persons whose
property was condemned to repurchase the property at the price the authority paid to the
governmental unit for the same. The person from whom the land is taken by
condemnation shall have the right to reacquire the land as aforementioned by application
to the court of competent jurisdiction, if such procedure be necessary, and shall be
entitled to recovery of his or her costs and reasonable attorney's fees necessary to
reacquire said land.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:12 PM Jacketed